Utah statutes.
78B-10-108.   Confidentiality.

Unless subject to Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act, and Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, mediation communications are confidential to the extent agreed by the parties or provided by other law or rule of this state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

